dictionaries/fi_FI/src/hunspell/fi_FI.aff
SFX I Y 1389
SFX I   i     ää          mpi
SFX I   i     ään         mpi
SFX I   i     änä         mpi
SFX I   pi    mät         mpi
SFX I   0     ä           mpi
SFX I   0     en          mpi
SFX I   0     in          mpi
SFX I   0     nä          mpi
SFX I   pi    män         mpi
SFX I   pi    mässä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mästä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mällä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mältä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mälle       mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksi       mpi
SFX I   pi    min         mpi
SFX I   pi    missä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mistä       mpi
SFX I   pi    millä       mpi
SFX I   pi    miltä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mille       mpi
SFX I   pi    miksi       mpi
SFX I   0     kin         mpi
SFX I   0     kään        mpi
SFX I   0     kö          mpi
SFX I   0     pä          mpi
SFX I   0     hän         mpi
SFX I   0     kinkö       mpi
SFX I   0     käänkö      mpi
SFX I   0     köhän       mpi
SFX I   0     pähän       mpi
SFX I   i     ääkin       mpi
SFX I   i     ääkään      mpi
SFX I   i     ääkö        mpi
SFX I   i     ääpä        mpi
SFX I   i     äähän       mpi
SFX I   i     ääkinkö     mpi
SFX I   i     ääkäänkö    mpi
SFX I   i     ääköhän     mpi
SFX I   i     ääpähän     mpi
SFX I   i     äänkin      mpi
SFX I   i     äänkään     mpi
SFX I   i     äänkö       mpi
SFX I   i     äänpä       mpi
SFX I   i     äänhän      mpi
SFX I   i     äänkinkö    mpi
SFX I   i     äänkäänkö   mpi
SFX I   i     äänköhän    mpi
SFX I   i     äänpähän    mpi
SFX I   i     änäkin      mpi
SFX I   i     änäkään     mpi
SFX I   i     änäkö       mpi
SFX I   i     änäpä       mpi
SFX I   i     änähän      mpi
SFX I   i     änäkinkö    mpi
SFX I   i     änäkäänkö   mpi
SFX I   i     änäköhän    mpi
SFX I   i     änäpähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mätkin      mpi
SFX I   pi    mätkään     mpi
SFX I   pi    mätkö       mpi
SFX I   pi    mätpä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mäthän      mpi
SFX I   pi    mätkinkö    mpi
SFX I   pi    mätkäänkö   mpi
SFX I   pi    mätköhän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mätpähän    mpi
SFX I   0     äkin        mpi
SFX I   0     äkään       mpi
SFX I   0     äkö         mpi
SFX I   0     äpä         mpi
SFX I   0     ähän        mpi
SFX I   0     äkinkö      mpi
SFX I   0     äkäänkö     mpi
SFX I   0     äköhän      mpi
SFX I   0     äpähän      mpi
SFX I   0     enkin       mpi
SFX I   0     enkään      mpi
SFX I   0     enkö        mpi
SFX I   0     enpä        mpi
SFX I   0     enhän       mpi
SFX I   0     enkinkö     mpi
SFX I   0     enkäänkö    mpi
SFX I   0     enköhän     mpi
SFX I   0     enpähän     mpi
SFX I   0     inkin       mpi
SFX I   0     inkään      mpi
SFX I   0     inkö        mpi
SFX I   0     inpä        mpi
SFX I   0     inhän       mpi
SFX I   0     inkinkö     mpi
SFX I   0     inkäänkö    mpi
SFX I   0     inköhän     mpi
SFX I   0     inpähän     mpi
SFX I   0     näkin       mpi
SFX I   0     näkään      mpi
SFX I   0     näkö        mpi
SFX I   0     näpä        mpi
SFX I   0     nähän       mpi
SFX I   0     näkinkö     mpi
SFX I   0     näkäänkö    mpi
SFX I   0     näköhän     mpi
SFX I   0     näpähän     mpi
SFX I   pi    mänkin      mpi
SFX I   pi    mänkään     mpi
SFX I   pi    mänkö       mpi
SFX I   pi    mänpä       mpi
SFX I   pi    mänhän      mpi
SFX I   pi    mänkinkö    mpi
SFX I   pi    mänkäänkö   mpi
SFX I   pi    mänköhän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mänpähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mässähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mässäpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mästähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mästäpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mällähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mälläpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mältähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mältäpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mällekin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mällekään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mällekö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mällepä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mällehän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mällekinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mällekäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mälleköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mällepähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksikin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksikään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksikö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksipä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksihän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksikinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksikäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksiköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mäksipähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    minkin      mpi
SFX I   pi    minkään     mpi
SFX I   pi    minkö       mpi
SFX I   pi    minpä       mpi
SFX I   pi    minhän      mpi
SFX I   pi    minkinkö    mpi
SFX I   pi    minkäänkö   mpi
SFX I   pi    minköhän    mpi
SFX I   pi    minpähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    missäkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    missäkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    missäkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    missäpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    missähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    missäkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    missäkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    missäköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    missäpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    mistähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    mistäpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    milläkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    milläkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    milläkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    milläpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    millähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    milläkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    milläkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    milläköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    milläpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäkin    mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäkään   mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäkö     mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäpä     mpi
SFX I   pi    miltähän    mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäkinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäkäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    miltäpähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    millekin    mpi
SFX I   pi    millekään   mpi
SFX I   pi    millekö     mpi
SFX I   pi    millepä     mpi
SFX I   pi    millehän    mpi
SFX I   pi    millekinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    millekäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    milleköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    millepähän  mpi
SFX I   pi    miksikin    mpi
SFX I   pi    miksikään   mpi
SFX I   pi    miksikö     mpi
SFX I   pi    miksipä     mpi
SFX I   pi    miksihän    mpi
SFX I   pi    miksikinkö  mpi
SFX I   pi    miksikäänkö mpi
SFX I   pi    miksiköhän  mpi
SFX I   pi    miksipähän  mpi
SFX I   i     änikin      mpi
SFX I   i     änikään     mpi
SFX I   i     änikö       mpi
SFX I   i     änipä       mpi
SFX I   i     änihän      mpi
SFX I   i     änikinkö    mpi
SFX I   i     änikäänkö   mpi
SFX I   i     äniköhän    mpi
SFX I   i     änipähän    mpi
SFX I   i     äsikin      mpi
SFX I   i     äsikään     mpi
SFX I   i     äsikö       mpi
SFX I   i     äsipä       mpi
SFX I   i     äsihän      mpi
SFX I   i     äsikinkö    mpi
SFX I   i     äsikäänkö   mpi
SFX I   i     äsiköhän    mpi
SFX I   i     äsipähän    mpi
SFX I   i     änsäkin     mpi
SFX I   i     änsäkään    mpi
SFX I   i     änsäkö      mpi
SFX I   i     änsäpä      mpi
SFX I   i     änsähän     mpi
SFX I   i     änsäkinkö   mpi
SFX I   i     änsäkäänkö  mpi
SFX I   i     änsäköhän   mpi
SFX I   i     änsäpähän   mpi
SFX I   i     ämmekin     mpi
SFX I   i     ämmekään    mpi
SFX I   i     ämmekö      mpi
SFX I   i     ämmepä      mpi
SFX I   i     ämmehän     mpi
SFX I   i     ämmekinkö   mpi
SFX I   i     ämmekäänkö  mpi
SFX I   i     ämmeköhän   mpi
SFX I   i     ämmepähän   mpi
SFX I   i     ännekin     mpi
